District of Columbia statutes.
4-214.01

Claim of District against estate of recipient; lien in favor of District; payment of share to United States.

(a)

At the death of any person who has received public assistance in the form of Old Age Assistance, or Aid to the Disabled pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or of any act repealed by this act, the District shall have a preferred claim for the amount of any such public assistance against the estate of the deceased recipient. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, no statute of limitations shall be deemed applicable as a defense to any claim of the District made pursuant to this section. The Mayor may waive any such claim when in his or her judgment he or she deems it appropriate to do so.

(b)

In addition to the remedy provided by subsection (a) of this section, or by any other provision of law, the Mayor may file a notice in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds in any case where public assistance in the form of Old Age Assistance or Aid to the Disabled is granted to any person under this chapter, and such notice shall constitute and have the effect of a lien in favor of the District against the real and personal property of such person for the amount of such public assistance which theretofore has been granted or which may thereafter be granted to, or on behalf of, such persons. Any such lien may be enforced by the proceeding filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia. The Mayor shall file in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds a release of any such real and personal property from the effect of such lien wherever there has been repaid to the District the amount of the public assistance theretofore granted to, or on behalf of, such person. The Mayor is also authorized to release any such lien when in his or her judgment he or she deems it appropriate to do so. Such notices and release may be filed without payment of fees.

(c)

If the District collects from any recipient of public assistance in the form of Old Age Assistance or Aid to the Disabled or from his estate, or otherwise, any amount with respect to public assistance furnished him or her under this chapter, the pro rata share to which the United States is equitably entitled shall be paid to the United States in accordance with the provisions of the Social Security Act, as amended (42 U.S.C. §§ 303, 603, 1203, 1353). The pro rata share due the District shall be deposited as miscellaneous receipts to the credit of the District.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1401, 29 DCR 1060

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-214.1.

References in Text

“This act,” referred to in the first sentence of subsection (a) of this section, is D.C. Law 4-101.